District of Columbia statutes.
44-1941

Repealed

Budgets and appropriations; bills for services.

Repealed.

May 13, 1977, D.C. Law 1-134, title IV, § 401, 24 DCR 406
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-212, § 402, 43 DCR 4962
See notes to § 44-1901.
1973 Ed., § 32-1341.
1981 Ed., § 32-241.

Title V, § 501(c) of D.C. Law 11-212, provided: “(c) Section 402 shall become effective upon the first meeting of the Board pursuant to section 204(h).”

D.C. Law 11-212, title IV, § 402 ( 43 DCR 4962), eff. April 9, 1997, provided: “The D.C. General Hospital Commission Act, effective May 13, 1977 (D.C. Law 1-134; D.C. Code § 32-201 et seq. [1981 Ed.]), is repealed.”

D.C. Law 1-134, title IV, § 401, eff. May 13, 1977, added §§ 32-241 to 32-243 [1981 Ed.].